Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.010

Declaration of policy.

The legislature declares that it is the policy of the state of Washington to provide for the completeness, accuracy, confidentiality, and security of criminal history record information and victim, witness, and complainant record information as defined in this chapter.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 1.]